testing/myv-tests-N-psaka-1.yaml
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакашканзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоськак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоськак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзодонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзосонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзосонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзостонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзостонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзовантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзовантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзошкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзошкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Comp+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакашканзотненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакасонзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзоськак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзоськак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзодонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзодонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзосонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзосонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзостонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзостонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзовантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзовантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзошкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзошкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Ine+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакасонзотненеккак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзодояк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзодояк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзокскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: псакастонзокскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзоськак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзоськак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзонтеньгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзодонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзодонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзосонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзосонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзостонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзостонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзовантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзовантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзошкантькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзошкантькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзоксонтькак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотненьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотненьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+DatCx+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнененьгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнедеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнесэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнестэяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнескак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнескак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотневаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотневаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнекскак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнекскак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотневгак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотневгак
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотневтемеяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотнешкаяк
    псака+N+Sg+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотненеккак
    псака+N+Pl+Ela+Px3Sg+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: псакастонзотненеккак
